Maryland, session 2026, SB0613.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
9–404.
(a) No person may:
(1) Import or transport a noxious weed in the State in any form capable of
growth; or
(2) Contaminate any uninfested land with a noxious weed through the
movement of rootstocks, seed, soil, mulch, nursery stock, farm machinery, or any other
artificial medium.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0613*

SENATE BILL 613
(b) [Each] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, EACH landowner,
including a landowner of public land, or person who possesses and manages land infested
with a noxious weed shall eradicate or control the noxious weed on that land by using
practices that the Secretary prescribes, including mowing, cultivating, or treating with an
approved herbicide.
(C) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “PALMER AMARANTH” MEANS THE PLANT
SPECIES PALMER AMARANTH (AMARANTHUS PALMERI) THAT IS LISTED AS A
NOXIOUS WEED IN REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) (I) IF, BASED ON AN INSPECTION BY THE DEPARTMENT, THE
DEPARTMENT FINDS PALMER AMARANTH ON LAND, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
ISSUE AN ORDER TO ERADICATE THE PALMER AMARANTH TO THE PERSON THAT
OWNS THE LAND.
(II) AN ORDER ISSUED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL REQUIRE THE PALMER AMARANTH TO BE ERADICATED WITHIN
2 WEEKS AFTER THE ORDER WAS ISSUED.
(III) IF THE DEPARTMENT ISSUES AN ORDER UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL INSPECT THE
LAND THAT IS SUBJECT TO THE ORDER EVERY 2 WEEKS UNTIL THE DEPARTMENT
DETERMINES THAT THE PALMER AMARANTH HAS BEEN ERADICATED.
9–406.
(a) Except as provided in [subsection (b)] SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C) of this
section, a person who violates this subtitle is subject to the penalties and fines set forth in
Title 12 of this article.
(b) [(1)] Instead of pursuing the penalties and fines set forth in Title 12 of this
article, the Secretary may impose on any person who violates this subtitle a penalty of:
[(i)] (1) For a first violation, not more than $500;
[(ii)] (2) For a second violation, not more than $1,000; or
[(iii)] (3) For a third or subsequent violation, not more than $2,000.
(C) A PERSON WHO IS IN VIOLATION OF AN ORDER ISSUED UNDER §
9–404(C)(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE IS SUBJECT TO AN ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY OF:
(1) FOR A FIRST VIOLATION, $500;
(2) FOR A SECOND VIOLATION, $1,000; OR

SENATE BILL 613 3
(3) FOR A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION, $2,000.
[(2)] (D) Penalties collected under [this subsection] SUBSECTIONS (B)
AND (C) OF THIS SECTION shall be distributed to a special fund, to be used only for the
control and eradication of a noxious weed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.